Nevada, session 83, SB225.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.193 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.193 1. Fees as listed in this section for filing declarations
of candidacy must be paid to the filing officer by cash, cashier’s
check or certified check.
Presidential preference primary candidate .................. $1,000
United States Senator .................................................... [$] 500
Representative in Congress ................................................ 300
Governor ............................................................................. 300
Justice of the Supreme Court .............................................. 300
Any state office, other than Governor or justice
of the Supreme Court .................................................... 200
District judge ...................................................................... 150
Justice of the peace ............................................................. 100
Any county office ............................................................... 100
State Senator ....................................................................... 100
Assemblyman or Assemblywoman .................................... 100
Any district office other than district judge .......................... 30
Constable or other town or township office ......................... 30
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
For the purposes of this subsection, trustee of a county school
district, hospital or hospital district is not a county office.
2. No filing fee may be required from a candidate for an office
the holder of which receives no compensation.
3. The county clerk shall pay to the county treasurer all filing
fees received from candidates. The county treasurer shall deposit the
money to the credit of the general fund of the county.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.194, a filing fee
paid pursuant to this section is not refundable.
Sec. 2. NRS 298.660 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.660 If a person who is a qualified candidate to be a major
political party’s nominee for President of the United States wants to
appear on the ballot for a presidential preference primary election
that is held for the party, the person must, not earlier than October 1
and not later than 5 p.m. on October 15 of the year immediately
preceding the presidential preference primary election, file with the
Secretary of State a declaration of candidacy in the form prescribed
by the Secretary of State [.] and pay the filing fee required by
NRS 293.193.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)